Alaska statutes. Title 42. Public Utilities and Carriers and Energy Programs.
Article 2. Certificate of Public Convenience and Necessity.

Collateral references. —

73B C.J.S., Public Utilities, § 42.

Sec. 42.05.221.
Certificates required.

A public utility may not operate and receive compensation for providing a commodity or service without first having obtained from the commission under this chapter a certificate declaring that public convenience and necessity require or will require the service. Where a public utility provides more than one type of utility service, a separate certificate of convenience and necessity is required for each type. A certificate must describe the nature and extent of the authority granted in it, including, as appropriate for the services involved, a description of the authorized area and scope of operations of the public utility.

All certificates of convenience and necessity issued to a public utility before July 1, 1970, remain in effect but they are subject to modification where there are areas of conflict with public utilities that have not previously been required to have a certificate or where there is a substantial change in circumstances.

A certificate shall be issued to a public utility that was not required to have one before July 1, 1970, and that is required to have one after that date, if it appears to the commission that the utility was actually operating in good faith on that date. Such a certificate is subject to modification where there are areas of conflict with other public utilities or where there has been a substantial change in circumstances.

In an area where the commission determines that two or more public utilities are competing to furnish identical utility service and that this competition is not in the public interest, the commission shall take appropriate action to eliminate the competition and any undesirable duplication of facilities. This appropriate action may include, but is not limited to, ordering the competing utilities to enter into a contract that, among other things, would:

delineate the service area boundaries of each in those areas of competition;

eliminate existing duplication and paralleling to the fullest reasonable extent;

preclude future duplication and paralleling;

provide for the exchange of customers and facilities for the purposes of providing better public service and of eliminating duplication and paralleling; and

provide such other mutually equitable arrangements as would be in the public interest.

If the commission employs professional consultants to assist it in administering this section, it may apportion the expenses relating to their employment among the competing utilities.

[Repealed, § 12 ch 136 SLA 1980.]

History.

(§ 6 ch 113 SLA 1970; am § 1 ch 76 SLA 1973; am § 12 ch 136 SLA 1980; am §§ 15, 16 ch 168 SLA 1990)

Administrative Code. —

For practice before the commission, see 3 AAC 48, art. 1.

For applications generally, see 3 AAC 48, art. 4.

For criteria for the provision of telecommunications relay service for the deaf, hard of hearing, and speech impaired, see 3 AAC 51, art. 1.

For allocation of facilities and services between competing electric utilities, see 3 AAC 52, art. 2.

For criteria for intrastate interexchange telephone competition, see 3 AAC 52, art. 4.

For water and wastewater utilities, see 3 AAC 52, art. 8.

For procedures for changing an authorized telecommunications carrier, see 3 AAC 53, art. 3.

For local exchange competition, see 3 AAC 53, art. 4.

For criteria for the provision of pay-per-call telephone service, see 3 AAC 53, art. 6.

For state telecommunications modernization plan, see 3 AAC 53, art. 8.

For criteria for the provision of private pay telephone service, see 3 AAC 53, art. 10.

Sec. 42.05.230.
[Repealed, § 5 ch 113 SLA 1970.]

Sec. 42.05.231.
Application.

Application for a certificate shall be in writing and shall be in the form and contain the information required by the commission by regulation.

History.

(§ 6 ch 113 SLA 1970)

Administrative Code. —

For utility and pipeline tariffs, see 3 AAC 48, art. 2.

For applications generally, see 3 AAC 48, art. 4.

For criteria for the provision of private pay telephone service, see 3 AAC 53, art. 10.

Sec. 42.05.240.
[Repealed, § 5 ch 113 SLA 1970.]

Sec. 42.05.241.
Conditions of issuance.

A certificate may not be issued unless the commission finds that the applicant is fit, willing, and able to provide the utility services applied for and that the services are required for the convenience and necessity of the public.
The commission may issue a certificate granting an application in whole or in part and attach to the grant of it the terms and conditions it considers necessary to protect and promote the public interest including the condition that the applicant may or shall serve an area or provide a necessary service not contemplated by the applicant.
The commission may, for good cause, deny an application with or without prejudice.

History.

(§ 6 ch 113 SLA 1970)

Administrative Code. —

For practice before the commission, see 3 AAC 48, art. 1.

For utility and pipeline tariffs, see 3 AAC 48, art. 2.

For applications generally, see 3 AAC 48, art. 4.

For criteria for intrastate interexchange telephone competition, see 3 AAC 52, art. 4.

For water and wastewater utilities, see 3 AAC 52, art. 8.

For procedures for changing an authorized telecommunications carrier, see 3 AAC 53, art. 3.

For local exchange competition, see 3 AAC 53, art. 4.

For state telecommunications modernization plan, see 3 AAC 53, art. 8.

For criteria for the provision of private pay telephone service, see 3 AAC 53, art. 10.

Sec. 42.05.250.
[Repealed, § 5 ch 113 SLA 1970.]

Sec. 42.05.251.
Use of municipal public ways.

Public utilities have the right to a permit to use public streets, alleys, and other public ways of a municipality upon payment of a reasonable permit fee and on reasonable terms and conditions and with reasonable exceptions the municipality requires.
The fee may not exceed the actual cost to the municipality of the utility’s use of the public way and of administering the permit program.
A dispute as to whether fees, terms, conditions, or exceptions are reasonable shall be decided by the commission.
The commission may require a utility to add the amount of any permit fee paid as a pro rata surcharge to its bills for service rendered at locations within the boundaries of any municipality that requires payment of a permit fee.

History.

(§ 6 ch 113 SLA 1970; am § 1 ch 104 SLA 1986)

Sec. 42.05.253.
Public utility regulatory cost charge. [Repealed, § 36 ch 2 FSSLA 1992.]

Sec. 42.05.254.
Public utility regulatory cost charge.

A regulated public utility or a certificated utility that provides telecommunications services operating in the state shall pay to the commission an annual regulatory cost charge in an amount not to exceed the maximum percentage of adjusted gross revenue that applies to the utility sector of which the utility is a part. The regulatory cost charges that the commission expects to collect from all regulated utilities and certificated utilities providing telecommunications services may not exceed the sum of the following percentages of the total adjusted gross revenue of all regulated public utilities and certificated utilities providing telecommunications services derived from operations in the state: (1) not more than .7 percent to fund the operations of the commission, and (2) not more than .17 percent to fund operations of the public advocacy function under AS

42.04.070(c)

and AS

44.23.020(e)

within the Department of Law. An exempt utility that does not provide telecommunications services shall pay the actual cost of services provided to it by the commission.

The commission shall by regulation establish a method to determine annually the amount of the regulatory cost charge for a public utility. If the amount the commission expects to collect under (a) of this section and under AS

42.06.286(a)

exceeds the authorized budgets of the commission and the Department of Law public advocacy function under AS

42.04.070(c)

and AS

44.23.020(e)

, the commission shall, by order, reduce the percentages determined under (h) of this section so that the total amount of the fees collected approximately equals the authorized budgets of the commission and the Department of Law public advocacy function under AS

42.04.070(c)

and AS

44.23.020(e)

for the fiscal year.

In determining the amount of the regulatory cost charge imposed under (a) of this section,

a utility selling utility services at wholesale shall modify its gross revenue by deducting payments it receives for wholesale sales;

a local exchange telephone utility shall modify its gross revenue by deducting payments received from other carriers for settlements or access charges;

an electric utility shall reduce its gross revenue by subtracting the cost of power; in this paragraph, “cost of power” means the costs of generation and purchased power reported to the commission.

The commission shall calculate the total regulatory cost charges to be levied against all regulated electric utilities under this section. The commission shall allocate the total amount among the regulated electric utilities by using an equal charge per kilowatt hour sold at retail.

The commission shall administer the charge imposed under this section. The Department of Revenue shall collect and enforce the charge imposed under this section. The Department of Administration shall identify the amount of the operating budgets of the commission and the Department of Law public advocacy function under AS

42.04.070(c)

and AS

44.23.020(e)

that lapse into the general fund each year. The legislature may appropriate an amount equal to the lapsed amount to the commission and to the Department of Law public advocacy function under AS

42.04.070(c)

and AS

44.23.020(e)

for operating costs for the next fiscal year. If the legislature does so, the commission shall reduce the total regulatory cost charge collected for that fiscal year by a comparable amount.

The commission shall allow a public utility to recover all payments made to the commission under this section. The commission may not require a public utility to file a rate case in order to be eligible to recover the regulatory cost charge.

The commission may adopt regulations under AS 44.62 (Administrative Procedure Act) necessary to administer this section, including requirements and procedures for reporting information and making quarterly payments. The Department of Revenue may adopt regulations under AS 44.62 (Administrative Procedure Act) for investigating the accuracy of filed information, and for collecting required payments.

The commission shall by regulation establish a method to determine annually the maximum percentage of adjusted gross revenue that will apply to each regulated public utility sector, the certificated telecommunications utility sector, and the regulated pipeline carrier sector. Other than the cost of services provided to exempt utilities that do not provide telecommunications services, the method established shall allocate the commission’s costs, and the Department of Law’s certified costs of its public advocacy function under AS

42.04.070(c)

and AS

44.23.020(e)

, among the regulated public utility sectors, the certificated telecommunications utility sector, and the regulated pipeline carrier sector based on the relative amount of the commission’s annual costs and the Department of Law’s certified costs that is attributable to regulating each sector. For purposes of this subsection, the Department of Law shall annually certify to the commission the costs of its public advocacy function under AS

42.04.070(c)

and AS

44.23.020(e)

.

In this section,

“adjusted gross revenue” means the gross revenue of a utility as modified under (c) of this section, if appropriate;

“exempt utility” means a public utility that does not provide telecommunications services and is certificated by the commission under AS

42.05.221

—

42.05.281

but, in accordance with AS

42.05.711

, is exempt from other regulatory requirements of this chapter;

“gross revenue” means the total operating revenue from intrastate services, as shown in a utility’s annual report required by the commission by regulation;

“regulated utility” means a public utility that is certificated by the commission under AS

42.05.221

—

42.05.281

and that is subject to the other regulatory requirements of this chapter;

“wholesale sales” means sales to another utility for resale under circumstances that make revenue from the resale subject to the regulatory cost charge imposed under this section.

History.

(§ 2 ch 1 SLA 1995; am §§ 8 — 11 ch 25 SLA 1999; am §§ 1 — 4 ch 98 SLA 2004; am §§
5 — 7 ch 24 SLA 2019)

Revisor’s notes. —

Subsection (h) was enacted as (i), and paragraph (i)(1) was enacted as (h)(5). Relettered and renumbered in 1999, at which time former subsection (h) was relettered as (i) and its paragraphs renumbered. Also in 1999, the reference in subsection (b) to “(h)” was substituted for “(i)” in conformity with these changes.

Administrative Code. —

For applicability, see 3 AAC 47, art. 1.

For regulatory cost charges for regulated public utilities and pipeline carriers, see 3 AAC 47, art. 2.

For regulatory cost charges for exempt utilities, see 3 AAC 47, art. 3.

For practice before the commission, see 3 AAC 48, art. 1.

For water and wastewater utilities, see 3 AAC 52, art. 8.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2019 amendment, effective November 27, 2019, in (a), inserted “or a certificated utility that provides telecommunications services” in the first sentence, inserted “and certificated utilities providing telecommunications services” in two places in the second sentence, and inserted “that does not provide telecommunications services” in the last sentence; in (h), substituted “sector, the certificated telecommunications utility sector, and the regulated” for “sector and the maximum percentage of gross revenue that will apply to the regulated” in the first sentence, inserted “that do not provide telecommunications services,” and “, the certificated telecommunications utility sector,” in the second sentence; and inserted “does not provide telecommunications services and” in (i)(2).

Sec. 42.05.260.
[Repealed, § 5 ch 113 SLA 1970.]

Sec. 42.05.261.
Discontinuance, suspension, or abandonment of certificated service.

Except as otherwise provided in this section, a public utility may not discontinue or abandon a service for which a certificate has been issued by the commission unless upon the application of the public utility and if, after notice and opportunity for hearing, the commission finds that the continued service is not required by public convenience and necessity. Any interested person may file with the commission a protest or memorandum of opposition to or in support of discontinuance or abandonment. The commission may authorize temporary suspension of a service or of part of a service.

Upon complaint or upon its own motion, the commission may reinvestigate a previously authorized discontinuance, abandonment, or suspension of a service of an operating public utility. If, after providing notice and an opportunity for a hearing, the commission finds that the public convenience and necessity require the service to be resumed, it may order the public utility to again provide the service.

History.

(§ 6 ch 113 SLA 1970)

Administrative Code. —

For practice before the commission, see 3 AAC 48, art. 1.

For applications generally, see 3 AAC 48, art. 4.

For criteria for the provision of statewide directory assistance, see 3 AAC 53, art. 7.

Sec. 42.05.270.
[Repealed, § 5 ch 113 SLA 1970.]

Sec. 42.05.271.
Modification, suspension, or revocation of certificates.

Upon complaint or upon its own motion the commission, after notice and opportunity for hearing and for good cause shown, may amend, modify, suspend, or revoke a certificate, in whole or in part.
Good cause for amendment, modification, suspension, or revocation of a certificate includes

the requirements of public convenience and necessity;

misrepresentation of a material fact in obtaining the certificate;

unauthorized discontinuance or abandonment of all or part of a public utility’s service;

wilful failure to comply with the provisions of this chapter or the regulations or orders of the commission; or

wilful failure to comply with a term, condition, or limitation of the certificate.

History.

(§ 6 ch 113 SLA 1970)

Administrative Code. —

For practice before the commission, see 3 AAC 48, art. 1.

For water and wastewater utilities, see 3 AAC 52, art. 8.

For criteria for the provision of private pay telephone service, see 3 AAC 53, art. 10.

Sec. 42.05.280.
[Repealed, § 5 ch 113 SLA 1970.]

Sec. 42.05.281.
Transfer of certificate.

A certificate may not be sold or leased, rented, transferred or inherited without the prior approval of the commission.

History.

(§ 6 ch 113 SLA 1970)

Administrative Code. —

For practice before the commission, see 3 AAC 48, art. 1.

For applications generally, see 3 AAC 48, art. 4.

Sec. 42.05.290.
[Repealed, 5 ch 113 SLA 1970.]